District of Columbia statutes.
1-301.22

Administration of oaths.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia, the Chairman of the Council of the District of Columbia, and the members of the Council of the District of Columbia may administer oaths as part of their official responsibilities. No fee shall be collected for the administration of such oaths, and the power to administer such oaths shall not be utilized for personal purposes.

May 19, 1982, D.C. Law 4-108, § 2, 29 DCR 1413
Council’s authority, power to investigate, issue subpoenas, and administer oaths, see § 1-204.13.
1981 Ed., § 1-338.1.